Washington statutes.
RCW 9A.44.132

Failure to register as sex offender or kidnapping offender.

(1) A person commits the crime of failure to register as a sex offender if the person has a duty to register under RCW 9A.44.130 for a felony sex offense and knowingly fails to comply with any of the requirements of RCW 9A.44.130.

(a) The failure to register as a sex offender pursuant to this subsection is a class C felony if the person has a duty to register under RCW 9A.44.130(1)(a) and:

(i) It is the person's first conviction for a felony failure to register; or

(ii) The person has previously been convicted of a felony failure to register as a sex offender in this state or pursuant to the laws of another state, or pursuant to federal law.

(b) If a person has a duty to register under RCW 9A.44.130(1)(a) and has been convicted of a felony failure to register as a sex offender in this state or pursuant to the laws of another state, or pursuant to federal law, on two or more prior occasions, the failure to register under this subsection is a class B felony.

(c) The failure to register as a sex offender is a gross misdemeanor if the person has a duty to register under RCW 9A.44.130(1)(b).

(2) A person is guilty of failure to register as a sex offender if the person has a duty to register under RCW 9A.44.130 for a sex offense other than a felony and knowingly fails to comply with any of the requirements of RCW 9A.44.130. The failure to register as a sex offender under this subsection is a gross misdemeanor.

(3) A person commits the crime of failure to register as a kidnapping offender if the person has a duty to register under RCW 9A.44.130 for a kidnapping offense and knowingly fails to comply with any of the requirements of RCW 9A.44.130.

(a) If the person has a duty to register for a felony kidnapping offense, the failure to register as a kidnapping offender is a class C felony.

(b) If the person has a duty to register for a kidnapping offense other than a felony, the failure to register as a kidnapping offender is a gross misdemeanor.

(4) Unless relieved of the duty to register pursuant to RCW 9A.44.141 and 9A.44.142, a violation of this section is an ongoing offense for purposes of the statute of limitations under RCW 9A.04.080.

[ 2023 c 150 s 6; 2019 c 443 s 4; 2015 c 261 s 5; 2011 c 337 s 5; 2010 c 267 s 3.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2023 c 150: See note following RCW 9A.44.130.

Short title—Findings—2019 c 443: See notes following RCW 43.43.754.

Application—2010 c 267: See note following RCW 9A.44.128.